Virginia statutes. Title 29.1. Wildlife, Inland Fisheries and Boating.
Article 1. Hunting, Trapping and Fishing Licenses.
§ 29.1-303.3.
Youth resident and nonresident combination hunting license established; fee.

There is hereby established a state youth resident combination hunting license, which may be obtained by any resident under the age of 16 to hunt in all counties and cities of the Commonwealth and to hunt (i) bear, deer, and turkey; (ii) with a bow and arrow or slingbow during the special archery seasons; (iii) with a crossbow during special archery seasons; and (iv) with a muzzleloader during the special muzzleloading seasons. The fee for this license shall be $15. The license shall serve in lieu of the state junior resident hunting license; the special license for hunting bear, deer, and turkey; the special archery license; the special crossbow license; and the special muzzleloading license. For a nonresident youth under the age of 16, the fee for such a license shall be $30. The Board may subsequently revise the cost of licenses set forth in this section pursuant to §

29.1-103

.

History.

1996, cc. 118, 151; 2004, c. 269; 2007, c. 40; 2009, c. 9; 2017, c. 530.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 269 substituted “16” for “sixteen” in the first sentence, substituted “$15” for “fifteen dollars” in the second sentence, and added the last sentence.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 40, in the first sentence, added present clause (iii) and redesignated former clause (iii) as present clause (iv); and inserted “the special crossbow license,” near the end of the third sentence.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 9 added the last sentence.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 530 inserted “or slingbow” following “bow and arrow” in clause (ii), and made stylistic changes.

§ 29.1-304.
Nonresident license to hunt within shooting preserves and foxhound training preserves.

Licenses are required for nonresidents of the Commonwealth to hunt within the boundaries of shooting preserves licensed under the provisions of Chapter 6 (§

29.1-600

et seq.) or foxhound training preserves allowed under the authority of Chapter 4 (§

29.1-400

et seq.). Such licenses shall be valid either within the boundaries of any licensed shooting preserves or any foxhound training preserves and may be in lieu of any license required by §

29.1-303

. The license fees shall be $12 or as subsequently revised by the Board pursuant to §

29.1-103

.

History.

1958, c. 145, § 29-54.1; 1972, c. 149; 1980, c. 494; 1987, c. 488; 1988, c. 250; 2009, cc. 9, 50.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 9 substituted “$12 or as subsequently revised by the Board pursuant to §

29.1-103

” for “twelve dollars” in the last sentence.

The 2009 amendment by c. 50 rewrote the section.

§ 29.1-305.
Special license for hunting bear, deer and turkey; authority of Board to create bear license.

A special license is required for hunting bear, deer and turkey in this Commonwealth, which shall be in addition to the license required to hunt other game. The fee for the special license shall be $12 for a resident age 16 or older, $7.50 for a resident under the age of 16, and $60 for a nonresident 16 years of age or older, $15 for a nonresident 12 years of age to 15 years of age, and $12 for a nonresident younger than 12 years of age.

The Board may create a separate special license for the hunting of bear in this Commonwealth. The fee for such a special license shall be $25 for residents and $150 for nonresidents. A person who obtains a special license for hunting bear shall also be required to obtain the state resident license or state nonresident license pursuant to §

29.1-303

. If a special license to hunt bear is established by the Board, the special license required in subsection A shall authorize the hunting of deer and turkey only.The license to hunt bear, deer and turkey or, if authorized by the Board, the license to hunt bear may be obtained from the clerk or agent of any county or city whose duty it is to sell hunting licenses.

The Board may subsequently revise the cost of licenses set forth in this section pursuant to §

29.1-103

.

History.

Code 1950, § 29-122; 1958, c. 318; 1960, c. 568; 1966, c. 493; 1972, c. 509; 1974, c. 363; 1980, c. 494; 1987, c. 488; 1988, c. 250; 2001, c. 55; 2004, c. 269; 2009, c. 9.

Cross references.

As to purchase of sportsman’s hunting and fishing license in lieu of license provided for in this section, see §

29.1-310.1

.

Editor’s note.

As to counties which may require big game stamps,

see Acts 1966, c. 471; Acts 1968, cc. 527, 692; Acts 1974, cc. 55, 109; Acts 1975, cc. 401, 409, 460; Acts 1976, c. 648; Acts 1977, c. 377; Acts 1979, cc. 116, 460.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 55 added the subsections A and B designators, added the first paragraph of subsection B, and inserted “or, if authorized by the Board, the license to hunt bear” in the second paragraph of subsection B.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 269 rewrote the last sentence in subsection A, which formerly read: “The fee for the special license shall be twelve dollars for a resident age sixteen or over, seven dollars and fifty cents for a resident under age sixteen and sixty dollars for a nonresident”; and substituted “$25” for “twenty-five dollars” in the first sentence of the first paragraph in subsection B.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 9 added subsection C.

§ 29.1-305.01.
Special license to hunt elk; authority of Board to create elk license and quota hunts.

The Board may create a separate special license to hunt elk within the designated elk management zone, as designated in the 2019-2028 Virginia Elk Management Plan, which shall be in addition to the license required to hunt other game. Any person, whether licensed or exempt from being licensed, shall possess (i) a valid state resident hunting license or state nonresident hunting license pursuant to §

29.1-303

and (ii) a special elk license in order to pursue elk within the designated elk management zone. A separate special license to hunt elk shall not be required to hunt elk outside of the designated elk management zone.

Upon creation of a special license to hunt elk, the Board may establish quotas and procedures for selection to purchase a special elk license. Application for selection for a special elk license may require a nonrefundable application fee of $15 for residents and $20 for nonresidents. The fee for a special elk license shall be no more than $40 for residents and $400 for nonresidents.

The Board may establish guidelines permitting the transfer of special elk licenses to individuals, cooperators who assist in meeting agency hunting objectives, or wildlife conservation organizations whose mission is to ensure the conservation of Virginia’s wildlife resources.

History.

2020, cc. 309, 310.

§ 29.1-305.1.
Bonus deer permits.

The Board shall establish by regulation a procedure for selling bonus deer permits.
Each bonus deer permit purchased shall entitle the holder thereof to take additional deer under conditions prescribed by the Board.
The cost of a bonus deer permit shall be set by the Board but shall not exceed the fee charged for the special license to hunt bear, deer and turkey, as prescribed under §

29.1-305

.
Clerks and license agents who sell hunting licenses shall sell bonus deer permits and shall be entitled to a service fee as prescribed in §

29.1-332

.

History.

1991, c. 676.

§ 29.1-305.2.
Special fox hunting licenses.

There shall be a special license for hunting foxes on horseback with hounds but without firearms. The special license shall exempt the licensee from the hunter education requirement of §

29.1-300.1

. The fee for the special license shall be the same as any license required by §

29.1-303

and shall be subject to subsequent revision by the Board pursuant to §

29.1-103

. This special license shall not be required of any person holding a hunting license required by §

29.1-303

.

History.

2014, c. 798.

§ 29.1-306.
Special archery license, slingbow license, and crossbow license.

There shall be a license for hunting with a bow and arrow, slingbow, or crossbow, during the special archery seasons, which shall be in addition to the licenses required to hunt small and big game. Any person who is disabled so as to prevent drawing the weight of a bow or crossbow may obtain such license for hunting with an arrowgun. The applicant shall provide proof of disability acceptable to the Director on a standardized form provided by the Department, which shall be in the person’s possession while hunting with an arrowgun.

The fee for the special license shall be $17 for a resident and $30 for a nonresident. The Board may subsequently revise the cost of licenses set forth in this section pursuant to §

29.1-103

.

History.

1985, c. 15, § 29-122.1; 1987, c. 488; 1988, c. 250; 1994, c. 725; 1996, cc. 102, 825; 1998, c. 144; 2005, c. 8; 2009, c. 9; 2014, c. 136; 2017, c. 530; 2018, cc. 557, 558.

Cross references.

As to purchase of sportsman’s hunting and fishing license in lieu of license provided for in this section, see §

29.1-310.1

.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 8, effective March 4, 2005, in the first sentence of the first paragraph, inserted “excluding crossbows,” substituted “shall” for “will” and made minor stylistic changes in the last sentence.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 9 added the last sentence in the first paragraph.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 136, substituted “or crossbow” for “excluding crossbows” and “licenses” for “license” and inserted “and big” in the first sentence; substituted “$17” for “$12” and “$30” for “$25” in the second sentence; and deleted the last paragraph, which read “The special archery license may be obtained from the clerk or agent of any county or city whose duty it is to sell licenses.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 530 inserted “slingbow” following “bow and arrow” in the first sentence.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 557 and 558 are identical, and added the last two sentences in the first paragraph.

§ 29.1-306.1.
Repealed by Acts 2014, c. 136, cl. 2.

Cross references.

For current provisions relating to special crossbow licenses, see §

29.1-306

.

Editor’s note.

Former §

29.1-306.1

, pertaining to creation of a special crossbow license, derived from Acts 2005, c. 8.

§ 29.1-307.
Special muzzleloading license.

There shall be a license for hunting with a muzzleloader or arrowgun during the special muzzleloading seasons, which shall be in addition to the license required to hunt small game.

The fee for the special license shall be $12 for a resident and $25 for a nonresident. The special muzzleloader license may be obtained from the clerk or agent whose duty it is to sell licenses in any county or city. The Board may subsequently revise the cost of licenses set forth in this section pursuant to §

29.1-103

.

History.

1990, c. 115; 2009, c. 9; 2018, cc. 557, 558.

Cross references.

As to purchase of sportsman’s hunting and fishing license in lieu of license provided for in this section, see §

29.1-310.1

.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 9 added the last sentence.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 557 and 558 are identical, and inserted “or arrowgun” in the first paragraph; and made minor stylistic changes.

§ 29.1-308.
Reserved.

§ 29.1-309.
Fees to trap.

The license fee to trap shall be as follows or as such fee may be subsequently revised by the Board pursuant to §

29.1-103

:

County or city resident license, ten dollars.

State resident license, thirty-five dollars.

State nonresident license, $150.

History.

Code 1950, § 29-56; 1952, c. 608; 1974, c. 363; 1979, c. 287; 1980, c. 494; 1983, c. 191; 1987, c. 488; 1988, c. 250; 1995, c. 77; 2009, c. 9.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 9 added “or as such fee may be subsequently revised by the Board pursuant to §

29.1-103

” at the end of the introductory language.

§ 29.1-309.1.
Special lifetime trapping license; permanently disabled persons and disabled veterans.

Any resident who is (i) a veteran with a permanent and total service-connected disability as certified by the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs or (ii) permanently disabled, as defined in §

58.1-3217

, may apply for and receive from the Department, for a fee of five dollars or as subsequently revised by the Board pursuant to §

29.1-103

, a special lifetime disabled trapping license. Such a person shall provide proof of his disability acceptable to the Director.

History.

2001, c. 62; 2009, c. 9; 2020, c. 958.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs” was substituted for “Veterans’ Administration” and “Department of Game and Inland Fisheries” was substituted for “Department.”

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 9 inserted “or as subsequently revised by the Board pursuant to §

29.1-103

”
in the first sentence.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 958 deleted “of Game and Inland Fisheries” following “from the Department” in the first sentence.

§ 29.1-309.2.
Special lifetime trapping license for senior citizens.

Any resident who is 65 years of age or older may apply for and receive from the Department, for a fee of $10 or as subsequently revised by the Board pursuant to §

29.1-103

, a special lifetime trapping license. Such a person shall provide proof of his age acceptable to the Director.

History.

2003, c. 145; 2009, c. 9.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 9 inserted “or as subsequently revised by the Board pursuant to §

29.1-103

”
in the first sentence.

§ 29.1-309.3.
State junior resident trapping license established; fee.

There is hereby established a state youth resident trapping license, which may be obtained by any resident under the age of 16, to trap in all counties and cities of the Commonwealth. The fee for this license shall be $10 or as subsequently revised by the Board pursuant to §

29.1-103

.

History.

2006, c. 70; 2009, c. 9.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 9 added “or as subsequently revised by the Board pursuant to §

29.1-103

” at the end of the last sentence.

§ 29.1-310.
Fees to fish.

The license fees to fish, which licenses shall not permit fishing for trout in waters stocked by the Department, shall be as follows:

County or city resident license to fish, in all inland waters of the county or city of residence only, $5.

State resident license to fish in all inland waters of the Commonwealth, $12.

State nonresident license to fish in all inland waters of the Commonwealth, $30.

State resident license to fish in the interstate waters of South Holston Reservoir pursuant to a reciprocal agreement established in accordance with §

29.1-535

, $20 in addition to the license required by subdivision 2.

The additional license fees for a trout license required to fish in designated waters stocked with trout by the Department or to fish for or harvest trout in the interstate waters of South Holston Reservoir shall be as follows:

State resident license, $12.

State nonresident license, $30.

The Board may subsequently revise the cost of licenses set forth in this section pursuant to §

29.1-103

.

History.

Code 1950, § 29-55; 1952, c. 355; 1958, c. 493; 1960, c. 566; 1962, c. 469; 1968, c. 649; 1974, c. 363; 1980, c. 494; 1985, c. 119; 1987, c. 488; 1988, c. 250; 1989, c. 208; 1994, c. 409; 2009, c. 9; 2010, c. 6.

Cross references.

As to purchase of sportsman’s hunting and fishing license in lieu of license provided for in subdivisions A 2 and B 1 of this section, see §

29.1-310.1

.

As to fees for special combined individual sportfishing licenses, see §

28.2-302.2:1

.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 9 added subsection C.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 6 added subdivision A 4; inserted “or to fish for or harvest trout in the interstate waters of South Holston Reservoir” in the introductory paragraph of subsection B; and made stylistic changes throughout.

§ 29.1-310.1.
Sportsman’s hunting and fishing license established.

Upon implementation of an automated point-of-sale licensing system, any resident individual may apply for and receive from the Department, after payment of the appropriate fee, a sportsman’s hunting and fishing license. This license shall serve in lieu of any person having to obtain hunting or fishing licenses provided for under subdivision 2 of §

29.1-303

and §§

29.1-305

,

29.1-306

, and

29.1-307

, and subdivisions A 2 and B 1 of §

29.1-310

.

Applications for the license authorized by this section shall be made to the Department. The license shall be valid for the seasons as established by the Board. The form and issuance of the license shall conform to the provisions of this chapter for all licenses.

The Board shall establish the fee for this license, which shall not exceed the total cost of purchasing each license separately.

History.

2000, c. 12; 2007, c. 40; 2014, c. 136.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 40 inserted “29.1-306.1” following “29.1-306” in the last sentence of subsection A.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 136, in subsection A, deleted “29.1-306.1” following “29.1-306” in the last sentence.

§ 29.1-310.2.
Special combined individual sportfishing licenses.

Residents and nonresidents of the Commonwealth may obtain a special combined sportfishing license to fish in all inland waters and the tidal waters of the Commonwealth during the open season. For residents, this license shall be in lieu of the state resident freshwater fishing license required by subdivision A 2 of §

29.1-310

, and the saltwater recreational license required by §

28.2-302.1

. The cost of this license for residents shall be the sum of the costs of the two component resident licenses. For nonresidents, this license shall be in lieu of the state nonresident freshwater fishing license required by subdivision A 3 of §

29.1-310

and the saltwater recreational license required by §

28.2-302.1

. The cost of this license for nonresidents shall be the sum of the costs of the two component nonresident licenses.Of the funds collected under this subsection, (i) the cost of the component saltwater license shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the Virginia Saltwater Recreational Fishing Development Fund, as established in §

28.2-302.3

, and (ii) the cost of the component freshwater fishing license shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the Game Protection Fund, as established in §

29.1-101

.The two component licenses shall be independently priced by their respective agencies. The freshwater fishing license shall be priced by the Board pursuant to §

29.1-103

. The saltwater recreational license shall be priced by the Marine Resources Commission pursuant to §

28.2-201

.

Residents and nonresidents of the Commonwealth may obtain a special combined sportfishing license to fish in all the tidal waters of the Commonwealth during the open season that covers the owner of a recreational boat not carrying anglers for hire, in any registered boat owned and operated by him, and his passengers. For residents, this license shall be in lieu of the state resident fishing license required by subdivision A 2 of §

29.1-310

, the saltwater recreational license required by §

28.2-302.1

, and the saltwater recreational boat license established by §

28.2-302.7

. The cost of this license for residents shall be $125. For nonresidents, this license shall be in lieu of the state nonresident fishing license required by subdivision A 3 of §

29.1-310

and the saltwater recreational license required by §

28.2-302.1

. The cost of this license for nonresidents shall be $200.Of the funds collected under this subsection, (i) $48 per resident license sold and $76 per nonresident license sold shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the Virginia Saltwater Recreational Fishing Development Fund, as established in §

28.2-302.3

, and (ii) $77 per resident license sold and $124 per nonresident sold shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the Game Protection Fund, as established in §

29.1-101

.

The Board may subsequently revise the cost of licenses set forth in this section pursuant to §

29.1-103

.

History.

2004, c. 486; 2009, c. 9; 2011, c. 287; 2012, c. 579.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2004, c. 486, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2005.”

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 9 added the last paragraph.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 287 added subsection A and C designations, and inserted subsection B.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 579 rewrote subsection A.

§ 29.1-311.
Trip fishing license for residents and nonresidents; trout stocked waters.

Residents and nonresidents of the Commonwealth may obtain trip fishing licenses to fish in the freshwater creeks, bays, inlets, and streams of the Commonwealth, or in any of the impounded waters of the Commonwealth during the open season for game fish. These licenses shall be in lieu of the regular season state or county fishing license required under subsection A of §

29.1-310

. The duration for which trip fishing licenses shall be valid shall be established by the Board. The fee for the trip fishing license shall be established by the Board and may be revised pursuant to §

29.1-103

.

Residents and nonresidents of the Commonwealth may obtain a special combined sportfishing trip license to fish in all inland waters and tidal waters of the Commonwealth during the open season. This license shall be in lieu of the trip fishing license specified in subsection A and the saltwater recreational license required by §

28.2-302.1

. The cost of the license shall be $10 for residents and $15 for nonresidents. The license shall be valid for five successive days as specified on the face of the license. Of the funds collected under this subsection, (i) $5 per license sold shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the Virginia Saltwater Recreational Fishing Development Fund as established in §

28.2-302.3

and (ii) $5 per resident license sold and $10 per nonresident license sold shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the Game Protection Fund as established in §

29.1-101

.

Residents and nonresidents shall be entitled to fish in designated waters stocked with trout by the Department or other public body only if they possess (i) a regular season state or county fishing license or a trip fishing license valid for at least five days and (ii) a trout license pursuant to §

29.1-310

or a special lifetime trout fishing license pursuant to §

29.1-302.4

.

The Board may subsequently revise the cost of licenses set forth in this section pursuant to §

29.1-103

.

History.

1954, c. 567, § 29-55.1; 1956, c. 51; 1958, c. 443; 1974, c. 363; 1987, c. 488; 1988, c. 250; 1991, c. 242; 2002, c. 67; 2004, c. 486; 2009, c. 9; 2013, c. 351; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 280.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2004, c. 486, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2005.”

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 67 inserted “or has obtained the special lifetime trout fishing license pursuant to §

29.1-302.4

” at the end of subsection B; and inserted “or a special lifetime trout fishing license pursuant to §

29.1-302.4

” at the end of subsection C.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 486, effective January 1, 2005, substituted “$10” for “six dollars” in the last sentence of subsection A; inserted subsection B; redesignated former subsections B and C as present subsections C and D; and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 9 added subsection E.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 351, in subsection A, added the third sentence and rewrote the last sentence, which read: “The fee for the trip fishing license shall be $5 for residents, $10 for nonresidents, and the license shall be effective for five successive days as specified on the face of the license.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 280, effective July 1, 2021, deleted former subsection C, which read “Possession of a trip fishing license by a nonresident shall not entitle him to fish in designated waters stocked with trout by the Department or other public body unless he also possesses the trout license required under subsection B of §

29.1-310

or has obtained the special lifetime trout fishing license pursuant to §

29.1-302.4

”; redesignated and rewrote former subsection D as subsection C, which read “Possession of a trip fishing license by a resident shall not entitle him to fish in designated waters stocked with trout by the Department or other public body. Residents shall only be entitled to fish in such waters if they possess (i) a regular season state or county fishing license and (ii) a trout license, as required by §

29.1-310

, or a special lifetime trout fishing license pursuant to §

29.1-302.4

.” Former subsection E was redesignated as subsection D at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

§ 29.1-312.
Special fishing or hunting permits for certain veterans.

Upon application received from the director or other comparable official representing any veterans hospital or other military hospital in Virginia, any adjoining state, or the District of Columbia, the Director may permit any organized group of patients (i) actually residing in such hospitals or (ii) actively receiving outpatient medical treatment to hunt without licenses on any lands of the Commonwealth where it is otherwise legal to do so or to fish without licenses in any public waters open to fishing, including designated waters stocked with trout and in waters where a daily fishing fee has been imposed pursuant to §

29.1-318

. The application for the permit shall state the date or dates upon which it will be used, the general area in which it will be used, and the name of the person or organization responsible for the group.

History.

1974, c. 277, § 29-55.3; 1987, c. 488; 2008, c. 11; 2009, c. 5.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 11 rewrote the first sentence.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 5 inserted “to hunt without licenses on any lands of the Commonwealth where it is otherwise legal to do so or” in clause (ii) of the first sentence.

§ 29.1-313.
Issuance of licenses for use of individuals in certain state facilities.

The Director shall have authority to issue at the regular fee, up to 25 state resident licenses to fish in the name of any state facility operated by the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services for use by individuals receiving services in those facilities.

History.

1972, c. 414, § 29-57.1:1; 1987, cc. 413, 488; 2009, cc. 813, 840; 2012, cc. 476, 507.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 813 and 840 are identical, and substituted “Behavioral Health and Developmental” for “Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “state facility” for “state institution” and “individuals receiving services in those facilities” for “patients of the institution,” and made a minor stylistic change.

§ 29.1-314.
Special fishing permits for certain handicapped persons.

Upon receipt of an application from an officer or designated representative of any organized group of physically or mentally handicapped persons who meet on a regular basis, including students at schools for the blind or deaf, the Director may issue not more than two permits of one day each, in any calendar year, to such group to fish without licenses in public waters open to fishing. The permits shall not be issued for use in designated waters stocked with trout or in waters where a daily fishing fee has been imposed pursuant to §

29.1-318

; however, a permit may be issued to such group to fish without licenses on the second Saturday of May in designated waters stocked with trout.

The application for the permit shall state the name and description of the group, the date upon which it will be used, the general area in which it will be used, and the name of the person or organization responsible for the group.

History.

1976, c. 144, § 29-55.3:1; 1987, c. 488; 2006, cc. 8, 37.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 8 and 37, effective February 23, 2006, are identical, and added the language beginning “however, a permit may be issued” at the end of subsection A.

§ 29.1-315.
Special fishing permits for certain school classes.

Upon receipt of an application from a qualified instructor, the Director may issue a special permit to the instructor authorizing the class described in the application to fish without licenses in public waters open to fishing. Any special permit so issued shall be valid only during regular school hours and only when fishing by the class occurs under the direct and immediate supervision of the instructor to whom it is issued. These special permits shall not be valid for fishing in designated waters stocked with trout or in waters where a daily fishing fee has been imposed pursuant to §

29.1-318

.

The application shall be a written request for a class fishing permit submitted by a qualified instructor and countersigned by the principal of the school in which the applicant teaches. The application shall state (i) the name of the school; (ii) the county or city in which the school is located; (iii) the name and general subject matter of the class; and (iv) the general geographic area in which the permit is intended to be used. For the purposes of this section a “qualified instructor” means a person who teaches in a school located in Virginia a course at the eighth grade level or above for which credit is awarded which includes instruction in fishing techniques and who possesses a valid license to fish in the area in which the fishing techniques are taught.

History.

1979, c. 197, § 29-55.3:2; 1987, c. 488.

§ 29.1-315.1.
Special permit to hunt and fish by youth during fish and wildlife education events.

Upon receipt of an application from an officer or other designated official representative of any nonprofit organization that has as one of its stated purposes to educate youth on Virginia’s fish and wildlife resources, the Director may issue a permit to an officer or representative of the organization that allows youths under the age of 18 years old who participate in a fish and wildlife educational event of the organization to hunt and fish. This permit shall serve in lieu of having to purchase a state youth resident combination hunting license pursuant to §

29.1-303

.3 or state resident basic hunting license pursuant to §

29.1-303

, the special license for hunting bear, deer, and turkey pursuant to §

29.1-305

, and the state resident fishing license pursuant to subsection A of §

29.1-310

. The permit shall be valid for a period of 48 hours. The permit fee shall be $25 or as subsequently revised by the Board pursuant to §

29.1-103

. The application for the permit shall state the date upon which it will be used, the general area in which it will be used, the name of the person and organization responsible for the group of participants, and the number of participants to be covered by the permit. All youth participating in a hunting event covered by the permit shall comply with the provisions of subsection A of §

29.1-300.1

regarding competence in hunter education, or shall be accompanied and directly supervised by an adult over the age of 18 who has, on his person, a valid Virginia hunting license.

For the purposes of this section, “accompanied and directly supervised” occurs when a person over 18 years of age maintains a close visual and verbal contact with, provides adequate direction to, and can immediately assume control of the firearm from the youth participant.

History.

2009, c. 45.

§ 29.1-316.
Special fishing permits for certain youth camps.

Upon receipt of an application from an officer or designated representative of any organized nonprofit tax-exempt youth camp, the Director shall issue a permit for the duration of any season of such youth camp that allows camp members under 18 years of age and camp employees to fish without licenses in public waters adjacent to property owned by the camp. Such permit shall not be issued for use in designated waters stocked with trout or in waters where a daily fishing fee has been imposed pursuant to §

29.1-318

.

The application for the permit shall state the name and description of the group, certification of the group’s tax-exempt status, the period of time during which it will be used, the general area in which it will be used, and the name of the person or organization responsible for the group.

History.

1980, c. 52, § 29-55.3:3; 1982, c. 27; 1987, c. 488; 2020, c. 570.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 570, in subsection A, inserted “and camp employees” in the first sentence and substituted “Such permit” for “The permits” in the second sentence and substituted “person” for “persons” in subsection B.

§ 29.1-317.
Special fishing permits for certain juveniles.

Upon application from the superintendent of any juvenile correctional center maintained and operated by the Department of Juvenile Justice, the Director may issue a permit to allow the residents of such juvenile correctional center to fish under supervision without licenses in public waters open to fishing. The permits shall not be issued for use in designated waters stocked with trout or in waters where a daily fishing fee has been imposed pursuant to §

29.1-318

.

The application for the permit shall state the name and description of the group, the period of time during which it will be used, the general area in which it will be used, and the name of the person who will be responsible for the group.

History.

1980, c. 188, § 29-55.3:4; 1987, c. 488; 1989, c. 733; 1996, cc. 755, 914.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1996, cc. 755 and 914, cl. 7, provide: “[t]hat the provisions of this act shall apply to offenses committed and to records created and proceedings held with respect to those offenses on or after July 1, 1996.”

§ 29.1-318.
Board may charge use fees for fishing in certain waters.

In addition to the license fees provided for elsewhere in this chapter, the Board may impose daily use fees, not to exceed $3.50 or as subsequently revised by the Board pursuant to §

29.1-103

, and issue permits therefor to fish in specially stocked trout waters as may be designated by the Board. The proceeds from the fees shall be set aside and used exclusively by the Board for the stocking and management of the streams. Permits shall be issued by the person or persons designated by the Board at or near the area in which the permits are required.

History.

1962, c. 397, § 29-55.4; 1968, c. 235; 1983, c. 53; 1987, c. 488; 1988, c. 250; 2009, c. 9.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 9 substituted “$3.50 or as subsequently revised by the Board pursuant to §

29.1-103

” for “three dollars and fifty cents” in the first sentence.

§ 29.1-319.
Persons entitled to county, city, or state resident licenses.

The following persons shall be entitled to a state resident license or to a county or a city license to hunt, trap, or fish provided that applications for a county or city license shall be made in the county or city in which the person meets the following criteria:

Any person born in the United States or who has been naturalized and who has been a bona fide resident of the county or city for six months next preceding the date of application for license in the county or city;

All persons who are and for two or more months next preceding the date of the application have been domiciliary residents of Virginia, upon execution of a certificate of residence prescribed by the Director;

Any legal voter of the county or city in which the license is applied for;

Any unnaturalized person who owns real estate in the county or city and who has actually resided there not less than five years next preceding the date of the application for the license in the county or city;

Any member of the armed forces of the United States, or a member of the immediate family of such a member as defined in §

2.2-3101

, upon execution of a certificate of residence if the member (i) resides in the Commonwealth, (ii) is on active duty, and (iii) is stationed at a military installation within, or in a ship based in, the Commonwealth;

Any member of the armed forces of the United States, on active duty, when authorized by the commanding officer of a military reservation. The privileges of this license shall be limited to hunting, trapping, or fishing only within the boundaries of that military reservation;

Any student, a resident of the Commonwealth, regularly enrolled in any bona fide preparatory school or institution of higher education in the Commonwealth and any student, not a resident of the Commonwealth, regularly enrolled in and boarding at any such school or institution who presents a certificate of enrollment for the current year to the clerk or any license agent in the county or city in which the school or institution is located;

Residents of cities whose limits are wholly within the county where the license is applied for, provided the residents have physically resided within the city for a period of six consecutive months before applying for a license.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 29-57, 29-58; 1956, c. 68; 1960, c. 536; 1962, c. 469; 1964, cc. 160, 451; 1966, c. 527; 1984, c. 26; 1987, c. 488; 2015, c. 678.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “institution of higher education” was substituted for “college, or university” and “or institution” was substituted for “college, or university” twice in subdivision 7 to conform to Acts 2016, c. 588.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 678 rewrote subdivision 5, which read “Members of the armed forces of the United States upon execution of a certificate of residence if they (i) reside in the Commonwealth and (ii) are on active duty and (iii) are stationed at military installations within, or in ships based in, the Commonwealth” and made stylistic changes.

§ 29.1-320.
Reserved.

§ 29.1-321.
Nonresident required to buy nonresident license.

Nonresidents of this Commonwealth shall be required, except as otherwise provided, to obtain a nonresident license to hunt, trap or fish.

History.

Code 1950, § 29-59; 1979, c. 287; 1983, c. 191; 1987, c. 488; 1995, c. 77.

§ 29.1-322.
Residents of counties bordering on streams.

The residents of counties bordering a nontidal stream shall have the right to hunt, trap and fish when not otherwise prohibited by law or regulation in such stream opposite the shoreline of the county for which such resident has a county license. The residents of counties bordering a tidal stream shall have the right to hunt, trap and fish out to the low-water mark or as far as the county limits of the county for which he has a license extend.

History.

Code 1950, § 29-60; 1987, c. 488.